sv: Justering av kolsyrenivå: Fast enplansnivå; Flera förinställda nivåer; Steglös justering; Övrigt
vi: Điều chỉnh mức độ cacbonat hóa: Mức cố định đơn; Nhiều mức thiết lập sẵn; Điều chỉnh vô cấp; Khác
es: Ajuste del nivel de carbonatación: Nivel único fijo; Múltiples niveles preestablecidos; Ajuste continuo; Otros
el: Ρύθμιση επιπέδου ανθράκωσης: Σταθερό ενιαίο επίπεδο; Πολλαπλά προκαθορισμένα επίπεδα; Συνεχής ρύθμιση (χωρίς διαβαθμίσεις); Άλλο
tr: Karbonasyon seviyesi ayarlaması: Sabit tek kademeli; Çoklu ön ayarlı seviyeler; Kademesiz ayar; Diğer
ru: Регулировка уровня газации: Фиксированный одноуровневый; Несколько предустановленных уровней; Плавная регулировка; Другое
th: การปรับระดับความซ่า: ความซ่าคงที่ระดับเดียว; ความซ่าหลายระดับที่กำหนดไว้ล่วงหน้า; การปรับความซ่าแบบต่อเนื่อง; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Ajuste do nível de carbonatação: Nível único fixo; Vários níveis predefinidos; Ajuste contínuo; Outro
fi: Hiilihapotustason säätö: Kiinteä yksi taso; Useita esiasetettuja tasoja; Portaaton säätö; Muu
hu: Szénsavtartalom beállítása: Fix, egyszintű; Több, előre beállított szint; Fokozatmentes állítás; Egyéb
pl: Regulacja poziomu nasycenia dwutlenkiem węgla: Stały pojedynczy poziom; Kilka predefiniowanych poziomów; Regulacja bezstopniowa; Pozostałe
en: Carbonation level adjustment: Fixed single level; Multiple preset levels; Stepless adjustment; Other
lt-LT: Gazuotumo lygio reguliavimas: Fiksuotas vieno lygio; Keli iš anksto nustatyti lygiai; Tolygus reguliavimas; Kita
hr-HR: Podešavanje razine karbonizacije: Jedna fiksna razina; Više unaprijed postavljenih razina; Podešavanje bez koraka; Ostalo
de: Anpassung des Kohlensäuregehalts: Einfache feste Stufe; Mehrere voreingestellte Stufen; Stufenlose Einstellung; Sonstiges
ko: 탄산 강도 조절: 고정식 단일 단계; 다단계 프리셋 레벨; 무단 조절; 기타
ja: 炭酸レベルの調整: 固定シングルレベル; 複数プリセットレベル; 無段階調節; その他
nb: Justering av karbontilsetningsnivå: Fast enkelt nivå; Flere forhåndsinnstilte nivåer; Trinnløs justering; Annet
zh-CN: 气泡浓度调整: 固定单档; 预设多档; 无级调节; 其他
sl-SI: Prilagoditev stopnje karbonizacije: Fiksna enojna raven; Več prednastavljenih ravni; Brezstopenjska nastavitev; Druga
fr: Réglage du niveau de gazéification: Niveau unique fixe; Plusieurs niveaux prédéfinis; Réglage continu; Autre
it: Regolazione del livello di carbonatazione: Livello singolo fisso; Livelli preimpostati multipli; Regolazione continua; Altro
pt-BR: Ajuste do nível de carbonatação: Nível único fixo; Vários níveis predefinidos; Ajuste contínuo; Outro
da: Justering af kulsyreindhold: Fast enkelt niveau; Flere forudindstillede niveauer; Trinløs justering; Andet
ro-RO: Reglarea nivelului de carbonatare: Nivel fix unic; Niveluri presetate multiple; Reglare continuă; Altele
sk-SK: Nastavenie úrovne sýtenia oxidom uhličitým: Pevná jedna úroveň; Viacero vopred nastavených úrovní; Plynulé nastavenie; Iné
nl: Aanpassing van het koolzuurgehalte: Vaste eenlaagse constructie; Meerdere vooraf ingestelde niveaus; Traploze afstelling; Overig
cs: Nastavení úrovně sycení oxidem uhličitým: Jedna fixní úroveň; Více přednastavených úrovní; Plynulé nastavení; Jiné
zh-TW: 碳酸化程度調整: 固定單層; 多個預設層; 無分段調節; 其他
bg-BG: Регулиране на нивото на карбонизация: Фиксирано единично ниво; Множество предварително зададени нива; Безстепенно регулиране; Друго